Hawaii statutes.
§467E-7 Licensing requirements. Every
applicant for a license as a social worker shall submit evidence satisfactory
to the director that the applicant meets the following requirements:

(1) For the licensed bachelor social worker, the
applicant:

(A) Holds a bachelor's degree from a college
or university in a social work program accredited by or deemed to be equivalent
to a program accredited by the Council on Social Work Education; and

(B) Has passed the basic level national
examination given by the Association of Social Work Boards;

(2) For the licensed social worker, the applicant:

(A) Holds a master's degree from a college or
university in a social work program accredited by or deemed to be equivalent to
an accredited program by the Council on Social Work Education or a doctoral
degree from a doctoral degree program in social work accredited by the Western
Association of Schools and Colleges or a comparable regional accreditation
body; and

(B) Has passed the intermediate or higher
level national examination given by the Association of Social Work Boards; and

(3) For the licensed clinical social worker, the
applicant:

(A) Has met the educational requirements in
paragraph (2);

(B) Has passed the clinical level national
examination given by the Association of Social Work Boards;

(C) Has provided evidence of successful
completion of at least three thousand hours of post masters clinical social
work experience under supervision completed within no fewer than two years, but
within no more than five years. Clinical social work experience shall include
a minimum of two thousand hours of assessment, clinical diagnosis, and
psychotherapy; no more than a maximum of nine hundred hours of client-centered
advocacy, consultation, and evaluation; and at least one hundred hours of supervision
as follows:

(i) At least sixty of the one hundred hours of
direct face-to-face supervision shall have been individualized supervision; and

(ii) Not more than forty hours of direct
face-to-face supervision may have been under small group (up to six
supervisees) supervision.

An applicant who submits evidence of
certification as a qualified clinical social worker or diplomate in clinical
social work by the National Association of Social Workers or as a board certified
diplomate by the American Board of Examiners shall be deemed to have satisfied
the experience requirements of this subparagraph;

(D) For the purposes of subparagraph (C),
shall have had clinical supervision as follows:

(i) The supervisor shall have been a licensed
clinical social worker with at least four thousand five hundred hours of post
masters clinical social work experience;

(ii) For the first five years after July 1,
2004, the following individuals shall be deemed to have satisfied the requirements
of a supervisor: a person with a master's degree in social work with at least
four thousand five hundred hours post masters clinical social work experience;
an individual who holds a diplomate in clinical social work or a board
certified diplomate certification; or a board certified psychiatrist,
psychologist, advanced practice registered nurse who has a minimum of four
thousand five hundred hours of post masters clinical experience in assessment,
clinical diagnosis, and psychotherapy; and

(iii) Supervision shall have included review of
assessment, clinical diagnosis, and psychotherapy; and

(E) In collaboration with the supervisor, may
elect to fulfill some or all of the supervision requirements set forth in
subparagraph (C) through face-to-face supervision that is conducted
electronically through a video conference service that is compliant with all
federal and state privacy, security, and confidentiality laws, including the
Health Insurance Portability and Accountability Act of 1996. Prior to making
such an election, it is incumbent upon the applicant to review the laws and
rules of other jurisdictions to determine the impact, if any, that electronic
supervision may have on license by endorsement in other states. [L 1994, c 251,
pt of §2; am L 1996, c 202, §13; am L 2001, c 55, §22; am L 2002, c 167, §11;
am L 2016, c 212, §2]

Revision Note

"July 1, 2004" substituted for "the effective
date of this Act".

Cross References

Clinical social workers licensed under paragraph (3),
appointment as child custody evaluators, see §571-46.4.

Previous
Vol10_Ch0436-0474
Next